Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
PART 1 RIGHTS OF PERSONS WITH INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
27-10.5-107. Procedure for resolving disputes over eligibility, modification of services or supports, and termination of services or supports.

Every state or local service agency receiving state money pursuant to section 27-10.5-104 or 25.5-10-105 shall adopt a procedure for the resolution of disputes arising between the service agency and any recipient of, or applicant for, services or supports authorized pursuant to section 27-10.5-104 or 25.5-10-105. The procedures must be consistent with rules promulgated by the department pursuant to article 4 of title 24 and must be applicable to the following disputes:

A contested decision that the applicant is not eligible for services or supports;

A contested decision to provide, modify, reduce, or deny services or supports set forth in the individualized plan or individualized family service plan of the person receiving services;

A contested decision to terminate services or supports;

A contested decision that the person receiving services is no longer eligible for services or supports.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 1369, § 9, effective July 1, 1992.)

The department shall promulgate rules pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., setting forth procedures for the resolution of disputes specified in subsection (1) of this section that shall:

Require that all applicants for services and supports and the parents or guardian of a minor, the guardian, or an authorized representative be informed orally and in writing, in their native language, of the dispute resolution procedures at the time of application, at the time the individualized plan is developed, and any time changes in the plan are contemplated;

Require that a service agency keep a written record of all proceedings specified pursuant to this section;

Require that no person receiving services be terminated from such services or supports during the resolution process;

Require that utilizing the dispute resolution procedure shall not prejudice the future provision of appropriate services or supports to individuals; and

Require that the intended action not occur until after reasonable notice has been provided to the person, the parents or guardian of a minor, the guardian, or an authorized representative, along with an opportunity to utilize the resolution process, except in emergency situations, as determined by the department.

(3.5) The resolution process need not conform to the requirements of section 24-4-105, C.R.S., as long as the rules adopted by the department include provisions specifically setting forth procedures, time frames, notice, an opportunity to be heard and to present evidence, and the opportunity for impartial review of the decision in dispute by the executive director or designee, if the resolution process has failed.

and (5) (Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 1369, § 9, effective July 1, 1992.)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 911, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section R&RE, p. 996, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(5) amended, p. 1083, § 8, effective April 9.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1369, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 1454, § 6, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

IP(1), IP(3), and (3.5) amended, (SB 09-044), ch. 57, p. 209, § 13, effective March 25.

L. 2013:

IP(1) amended, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1798, § 9, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2022:

IP(1) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 863, § 114, effective July 1.

27-10.5-108. Discharge.

A person receiving services shall be discharged from services or supports upon a determination, made pursuant to the individualized planning process, that the services or supports are no longer appropriate. At least ten days prior to effectuation of the discharge, notification of discharge shall be given to the person receiving services, the parents or guardian of such a person who is a minor, and such person's legal guardian and authorized representative when applicable.

When a person receiving services notifies a service agency that such person no longer wishes to receive a service or support, the person shall be discharged from such service or support unless the person is subject to a petition to impose a legal disability or to remove a legal right, filed pursuant to section 27-10.5-110 or section 25.5-10-216, C.R.S., or for whom a legal guardian has been appointed, affecting the person's ability to voluntarily terminate services or supports. The parents of the person receiving services who is a minor and such person's guardian shall be notified of the person's wish to terminate services or supports, but no minor will be discharged without the consent of the parent or legal guardian.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 911, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section R&RE, p. 997, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1371, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2) amended, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1799, § 10, effective March 1, 2014.

27-10.5-109. Community residential home - licenses - rules - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 911, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section R&RE, p. 997, § 11, effective January 1, 1986.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1371, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 2712, § 287, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

IP(6) amended, p. 1454, § 7, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

(3), (5), and IP(6) amended, (SB 09-044), ch. 57, p. 209, § 14, effective March 25.

L. 2012:

(2) and (3) amended, (HB 12-1294), ch. 252, p. 1260, § 12, effective June 4.

L. 2013:

(6)(d) added, (SB 13-283), ch. 332, p. 1896, § 16, effective May 28; (7) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-109.5. Compliance with local government zoning regulations - notice to local governments - provisional licensure - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 1517, § 5, effective June 1.

L. 2013:

(4) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-110. Imposition of legal disability - removal of legal right.

Any interested person may petition the court pursuant to section 25.5-10-216, C.R.S., to impose a legal disability on or to remove a legal right from a person with an intellectual and developmental disability as defined in section 25.5-10-202, C.R.S. The petition shall set forth the disability to be imposed or the legal right to be removed and the reasons therefor. The petition may affect the right to contract, the right to determine place of abode or provisions of services and supports, the right to operate a motor vehicle, and other similar rights.

A person shall not be admitted to a regional center without a court order issued pursuant to section 25.5-10-216, C.R.S., except in an emergency or for the purpose of temporary respite care.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 912, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section R&RE, p. 998, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1372, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(2)(a)(II) amended, (HB 10-1213), ch. 220, p. 961, § 4, effective May 10.

L. 2013:

Entire section R&RE, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1799, § 11, effective March 1, 2014.

27-10.5-110.5. Rights of persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

Each person receiving services pursuant to this article and article 10 of title 25.5, C.R.S., shall have the rights set forth in sections 25.5-10-223 to 25.5-10-230, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1799, § 12, effective March 1, 2014.

27-10.5-111. Conduct of court proceedings - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 912, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1000, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-112. Individuals' rights - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 912, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1000, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1374, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(5) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-113. Right to individualized plan or individualized family service plan - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 913, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1) and (2) amended and (3) repealed, pp. 1001, 1016, §§ 15, 46, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1375, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1565, § 9, effective May 31.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1455, § 8, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(2) amended, (HB 10-1213), ch. 220, p. 962, § 5, effective May 10.

L. 2013:

(3) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-114. Right to medical care and treatment - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 913, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1), (3) to (5), (7), and (8) amended, p. 1001, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended and (6.5) added, pp. 1375, 1157, §§ 15, 13, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(6.5) amended, p. 1024, § 47, effective August 6.

L. 2003:

(3) and (6.5) amended, p. 714, § 55, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(11) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-115. Right to humane care and treatment - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 914, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(2) and (8) amended, p. 1002, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1377, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(12) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-116. Right to religious belief, practice, and worship - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 915, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1004, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1379, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-117. Rights to communications and visits - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 915, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1) to (3), (5), and (6) amended and (4) and (7) repealed, pp. 1004, 1016, §§ 19, 46, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1379, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(8) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-118. Right to fair employment practices - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 916, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1004, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1379, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(7) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-119. Right to vote - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 916, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1005, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1380, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1798, § 71, effective June 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 750, § 130, effective May 10; (2) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-120. Records and confidentiality of information pertaining to eligible persons or their families - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 916, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1005, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1380, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(4) added, p. 1455, § 9, effective August 5.

L. 2013:

(5) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-121. Right to personal property - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 917, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1006, § 23, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1381, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(4) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-122. Right to influence policy - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 917, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1007, § 24, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1382, § 23, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-123. Right to notification - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 917, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1007, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1382, § 24, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-124. Discrimination - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 917, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1007, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1382, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-125. Transfer of residents. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 917, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section repealed, p. 1016, § 46, effective July 1.

27-10.5-126. Return of residents. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 917, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section repealed, p. 1016, § 46, effective July 1.

27-10.5-127. Restoration of rights. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 917, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section repealed, p. 1016, § 46, effective July 1.

27-10.5-128. Sterilization rights - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 918, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

IP(1), (1)(b), and (2) amended, p. 1007, § 27, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1382, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(6) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-129. Competency to give consent to sterilization - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 918, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

IP(1) and (2) to (4) amended, p. 1008, § 28, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1383, § 27, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(4) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-130. Court-ordered sterilization - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 919, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1) amended, p. 1009, § 29, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1384, § 28, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(7) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-131. Confidentiality of sterilization proceedings - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 919, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1009, § 30, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1386, § 29, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-132. Limitations on sterilization - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 919, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(3) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-133. Group homes for the developmentally disabled. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 919, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 76:

(1)(a), (1)(b), and (2) amended and (2.5) added, p. 671, § 2, effective May 20.

L. 85:

Entire section repealed, p. 1016, § 46, effective July 1.

27-10.5-134. Civil action and attorney fees - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 920, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-135. Terminology - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 920, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1009, § 31, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1386, § 30, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(2) amended, p. 773, § 54, effective June 1.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 1406, § 72, effective August 7.

L. 2013:

(3) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-136. Adjudication of competency. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 920, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 1976. (See L. 75, p. 920.)

27-10.5-137. Federal funds - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 1009, § 32, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-138. Service provision system evaluation. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 1009, § 32, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 1988. (See L. 85, p. 1009.)

27-10.5-139. Evaluations to determine whether a defendant is mentally retarded for purposes of class 1 felony trials - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 1258, § 24, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1541, § 281, effective October 1.

L. 2013:

(2) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-140. Child find - responsibilities - interagency operating agreements - rules. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1565, § 10, effective May 31.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1455, § 10, effective August 5.

27-10.5-141. Retaliation prohibited - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 1235, § 5, effective May 27.

L. 2013:

(2) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective March 1, 2014. (See L. 2013, pp. 1799, 1813.)

27-10.5-142. Caregiver abuse - duties of the department - working group - issues - report - funding - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 2212, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2013:

(7) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 14, 56.

Editor's note:

Subsection (7) provided for the repeal of this section, effective March 1, 2014. (See L. 2013, pp. 1799, 1813.)

27-10.5-143. Caregiver abuse - task force - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1178), ch. 84, p. 308, § 1, effective April 2.

L. 2013:

(3) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 14, 56.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section, effective March 1, 2014. (See L. 2013, pp. 1799, 1813.)